Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 32
COLORADO MINED LAND RECLAMATION ACT

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 13 of chapter 92, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1976, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1976, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. sections are shown in editors' notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

34-32-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Mined Land Reclamation Act".

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 724, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-101 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-102. Legislative declaration.

It is declared to be the policy of this state that the extraction of minerals and the reclamation of land affected by such extraction are both necessary and proper activities. It is further declared to be the policy of this state that both such activities should be and are compatible. It is the intent of the general assembly by the enactment of this article to foster and encourage the development of an economically sound and stable mining and minerals industry and to encourage the orderly development of the state's natural resources, while requiring those persons involved in mining operations to reclaim land affected by such operations so that the affected land may be put to a use beneficial to the people of this state. It is the further intent of the general assembly by the enactment of this article to conserve natural resources, to aid in the protection of wildlife and aquatic resources, to establish agricultural, recreational, residential, and industrial sites, and to protect and promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

The general assembly further declares that it is the intent of this article to require the development of a mined land reclamation regulatory program in which the economic costs of reclamation measures utilized bear a reasonable relationship to the environmental benefits derived from such measures. The mined land reclamation board or the office, when considering the requirements of reclamation measures, shall evaluate the benefits expected to result from the use of such measures. It is also the intent of the general assembly that consideration be given to the economic reasonableness of the action of the mined land reclamation board or the office. In considering economic reasonableness, the financial condition of an operator shall not be a factor.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that:

It is the policy of this state to recognize that mining operations are conducted by government and private entities;

All people of the state benefit from the reclamation of mined land;

The funding to ensure that reclamation is achieved should be borne equitably by both the public and private sectors;

The funding for enforcement and other activity that is conducted for the benefit of the general public should be supported by the general fund;

It is the policy of this state to allocate resources adequate to accomplish the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 724, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1200, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1431, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 1937, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(3)(e) added, p. 1175, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-102 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Acid or toxic producing materials" means natural or reworked earth materials having acid or toxic chemical and physical characteristics.

(1.5) "Affected land" means the surface of an area within the state where a mining operation is being or will be conducted, which surface is disturbed as a result of such operation. Affected lands include but shall not be limited to private ways, roads, except those roads excluded pursuant to this subsection (1.5), and railroad lines appurtenant to any such area; land excavations; prospecting sites; drill sites or workings; refuse banks or spoil piles; evaporation or settling ponds; leaching dumps; placer areas; tailings ponds or dumps; work, parking, storage, or waste discharge areas; and areas in which structures, facilities, equipment, machines, tools, or other materials or property which result from or are used in such operations are situated. All lands shall be excluded that would be otherwise included as land affected but which have been reclaimed in accordance with an approved plan or otherwise, as may be approved by the board. Affected land shall not include off-site roads which existed prior to the date on which notice was given or permit application was made to the office and which were constructed for purposes unrelated to the proposed mining operation and which will not be substantially upgraded to support the mining operation or off-site groundwater monitoring wells.

"Board" means the mined land reclamation board established by section 34-32-105.

"Department" means the department of natural resources or such department, commission, or agency as may lawfully succeed to the powers and duties of such department.

(3.5) (a) "Designated mining operation" means a mining operation at which:

Toxic or acidic chemicals used in extractive metallurgical processing are present on site;

Acid- or toxic-forming materials will be exposed or disturbed as a result of mining operations; or

Uranium is developed or extracted, either by in situ leach mining or by conventional underground or open mining techniques. A uranium mining operation may seek an exemption from designated mining operation status in accordance with section 34-32-112.5 (2).

The various types of designated mining operations are identified in section 34-32-112.5. Except as provided in subparagraph (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3.5), such mining operations exclude operations that do not use toxic or acidic chemicals in processing for purposes of extractive metallurgy and that will not cause acid mine drainage.

"Development" means the work performed in relation to a deposit, following the prospecting required to prove minerals are in existence in commercial quantities but prior to production activities, aimed at, but not limited to, preparing the site for mining, defining further the ore deposit by drilling or other means, conducting pilot plant operations, constructing roads or ancillary facilities, and other related activities.

(4.5) "Director" means the director of the division of reclamation, mining, and safety or such officer as may lawfully succeed to the powers and duties of such director.

(4.7) "Division" means the division of reclamation, mining, and safety or such agency as may lawfully succeed to the powers and duties of such division.

(4.9) "Environmental protection plan" means a plan submitted by a designated mining operation for approval as part of the operator's or applicant's permit for such operation pursuant to rules promulgated by the board for protection of human health or property or the environment in conformance with the duties of operators as prescribed by this article.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of natural resources or such officer as may lawfully succeed to the powers and duties of such executive director.

(5.5) "Financial warranty" means a warranty of the type described in section 34-32-117 (3) and (4).

(5.7) "In situ leach mining" means in situ mining for uranium through the in-place dissolution of mineral components of an ore deposit by causing a chemical leaching solution, usually aqueous, to penetrate or to be pumped down wells through the ore body and then removing the mineral-containing solution for development or extraction of the mineral values.

(5.8) "In situ mining" means the in-place development or extraction of a mineral by means other than open mining or underground mining.

"Life of the mine" means that a permit granted pursuant to section 34-32-110 or 34-32-115 may continue in effect as long as:

An operator continues to engage in the extraction of minerals and complies with the provisions of this article;

Mineral reserves are shown by the operator to remain in the mining operation and the operator plans to, or does, temporarily cease production for one hundred eighty days or more if he files a notice thereof with the board stating the reasons for nonproduction, a plan for the resumption thereof, and the measures taken to comply with reclamation and other necessary activities as established by the board to maintain the mine in a nonproducing state. The requirement of a notice of temporary cessation shall not apply to operators who resume operating within one year and have included, in their permit applications, a statement that the affected lands are to be used for less than one hundred eighty days per year.

Production is resumed within five years of the date production ended, or the operator files a report requesting an extension of the period of temporary cessation of production with the board stating the reasons for the continuation of nonproduction and those factors necessary to, and his plans for, resumption of production. In no case shall temporary cessation of production be continued for more than ten years without terminating the operation and fully complying with the reclamation requirements of this article.

The board does not take action to declare termination of the life of the mine, which action shall require a sixty-day notice to the operator alleging a violation of, or that inadequate reasons are provided in an operator's report under subparagraph (I), (II), or (III) of this paragraph (a). In such cases, the board shall provide a reasonable opportunity for the operator to meet with the board to present the full case and further provide reasonable time for the operator to bring violations into compliance.

"Life of the mine" includes that period of time after cessation of production necessary to complete reclamation of disturbed lands as required by the board and this article, until such time as the board releases, in writing, the operator from further reclamation obligations regarding the affected land, declares the operation terminated, and releases all applicable performance and financial warranties.

"Mineral" means an inanimate constituent of the earth in a solid, liquid, or gaseous state which, when extracted from the earth, is useable in its natural form or is capable of conversion into a useable form as a metal, a metallic compound, a chemical, an energy source, or a raw material for manufacturing or construction material. For the purposes of this article, this definition does not include coal, surface or subsurface water, geothermal resources, or natural oil and gas together with other chemicals recovered therewith, but does include oil shale.

"Mining operation" means the development or extraction of a mineral from its natural occurrences on affected land. The term "mining operation" includes, but is not limited to, open mining, in situ mining, in situ leach mining, surface operations, and the disposal of refuse from underground mining, in situ mining, and in situ leach mining. The term "mining operation" also includes the following operations on affected lands: Transportation; concentrating; milling; evaporation; and other processing. The term "mining operation" does not include: The exploration and extraction of natural petroleum in a liquid or gaseous state by means of wells or pipe; the development or extraction of coal; the extraction of geothermal resources; smelting, refining, cleaning, preparation, transportation, and other off-site operations not conducted on affected land; or the extraction of construction material where there is no development or extraction of any mineral.

(8.5) "Office" means the office of mined land reclamation, created in section 34-32-105.

"Open mining" means the mining of minerals by removing the overburden lying above such deposits and mining directly from the deposits thereby exposed. The term includes mining directly from such deposits where there is no overburden. The term includes, but is not limited to, such practices as open cut mining, open pit mining, strip mining, quarrying, and dredging.

"Operator" means any person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation, or any department, division, or agency of federal, state, county, or municipal government engaged in or controlling a mining operation.

"Overburden" means all of the earth and other materials which lie above natural minerals and also means such earth and other materials disturbed from their natural state in the process of mining.

(11.5) "Performance warranty" means a warranty of the type described in section 34-32-117 (2).

"Prospecting" means the act of searching for or investigating a mineral deposit. "Prospecting" includes, but is not limited to, sinking shafts, tunneling, drilling core and bore holes and digging pits or cuts and other works for the purpose of extracting samples prior to commencement of development or extraction operations, and the building of roads, access ways, and other facilities related to such work. The term does not include those activities which cause no or very little surface disturbance, such as airborne surveys and photographs, use of instruments or devices which are hand carried or otherwise transported over the surface to make magnetic, radioactive, or other tests and measurements, boundary or claim surveying, location work, or other work which causes no greater land disturbance than is caused by ordinary lawful use of the land by persons not prospecting. The term also does not include any single activity which results in the disturbance of a single block of land totaling one thousand six hundred square feet or less of the land's surface, not to exceed two such disturbances per acre; except that the cumulative total of such disturbances will not exceed five acres statewide in any prospecting operation extending over twenty-four consecutive months.

"Reclamation" means the employment during and after a mining operation of procedures reasonably designed to minimize as much as practicable the disruption from the mining operation and to provide for the establishment of plant cover, stabilization of soil, the protection of water resources, or other measures appropriate to the subsequent beneficial use of such affected lands. Reclamation shall be conducted in accordance with the performance standards of this article.

"Refuse" means all waste material directly connected with the cleaning and preparation of substances mined by a mining operation.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 724, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(7) and (8) amended, p. 1305, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(3.5), (6)(b), and (11.5) amended, p. 1667, §§ 1, 2, effective June 19.

L. 88:

(1) and (13) amended and (4.5) and (4.7) added, p. 1201, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1), (4.5), and (4.7) amended and (8.5) added, p. 1937, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended and (1.5), (3.5), and (4.9) added, p. 1175, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 178, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2006:

(1.5) amended, p. 1285, § 1, effective May 26; (4.5) and (4.7) amended, p. 217, § 11, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(3.5) and (8) amended and (5.7) and (5.8) added, p. 935, § 1, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-103 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-104. Administration.

In addition to the duties and powers prescribed by the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the office has the full power and authority to carry out and administer the provisions of this article and article 32.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 727, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1201, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1938, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 1188, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-104 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-105. Office of mined land reclamation - mined land reclamation board - created.

There is created, in the division of reclamation, mining, and safety in the department of natural resources, the office of mined land reclamation and, in the department of natural resources, the mined land reclamation board. The head of the office of mined land reclamation is appointed by the director. The head of the office of mined land reclamation must have professional and supervisory experience in mined land reclamation, mining, or natural resource planning and management. The office of mined land reclamation is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The board consists of seven members as follows:

The executive director or the executive director's designee, who shall serve as secretary to the board;

A member of the state conservation board appointed by such board; and

Five persons appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. Such appointed members shall be:

Three individuals with substantial experience in agriculture or conservation, no more than two of whom shall have had experience in agriculture or conservation; and

Two individuals with substantial experience in the mining industry.

Members appointed to the board shall serve for terms of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than three members' terms expire in the same year. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments for the balance of the unexpired term.

All members of the board:

Shall be residents of the state of Colorado; and

Except for the executive director, are entitled to receive compensation for their service on the board at the rate of fifty dollars per diem and to be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties on the board.

The board shall, by majority vote of all members, elect its chair from among the appointed members biannually.

The mined land reclamation board is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions specified in this article 32 under the department.

The board shall have jurisdiction and authority over all persons and property, public and private, necessary to enforce the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 727, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1202, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 1432, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 1938, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 514, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 217, § 12, effective August 7.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 75, § 103, effective February 25; (1) and (3) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3409, § 164, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-105 as it existed prior to 1976.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

34-32-106. Duties of board.

The board shall:

Meet at least once each month;

Carry on a continuing review of the problems of mining and land reclamation in the state of Colorado;

Develop and promulgate standards for land reclamation plans and substitution of affected lands as provided in section 34-32-116;

Cause to be published its monthly agenda with a brief description of affected land and name of the applicant. These publications shall be in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed mining operations listed in that month's agenda.

Perform such other duties as are required pursuant to article 33 of this title.

It is the duty of the department of agriculture, the department of higher education, the state conservation board, the Colorado geological survey, the division of parks and wildlife, the division of water resources, the university of Colorado, Colorado state university, Colorado school of mines, and the state forester to furnish the board and its designees, as far as practicable, whatever data and technical assistance the board may request and deem necessary for the performance of total reclamation and enforcement duties.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 728, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1)(e) added, p. 1306, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(2) amended, p. 687, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 515, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-106 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-107. Powers of board.

The board may initiate and encourage studies and programs through the department and in other agencies and institutions of state government relating to the development of less destructive methods of mining operations, better methods of land reclamation, more effective reclaimed land use, and coordination of the provisions of this article with the programs of other state agencies dealing with environmental, recreational, rehabilitation, and related concerns.

The board may delegate authority to the office as necessary to efficiently carry out and administer the provisions of this article and article 32.5 of this title. Any person aggrieved by any final action of the office may file an appeal of such action with the board. Such appeals shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 728, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1202, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 1938, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 1188, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-107 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-108. Rules and regulations.

The board may adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations respecting the administration of this article and article 32.5 of this title and in conformity therewith.

All rules and regulations shall be subject to the provisions of section 24-4-103, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 728, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(2) R&RE, p. 1556, § 1, effective July 1, 1978.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 1189, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-108 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-109. Necessity of reclamation permit - application to existing permits.

Reclamation permits for mining operations shall be obtained as specified in this article.

After June 30, 1976, any operator proposing to engage in a new mining operation must first obtain from the board or office a reclamation permit as specified in this article.

Applications for reclamation permits filed under the provisions of the "Colorado Open Mining Land Reclamation Act of 1973" prior to and pending on July 1, 1976, shall be processed in accordance with the provisions of this article. Reclamation permits granted under the provisions of the "Colorado Open Mining Land Reclamation Act of 1973" prior to July 1, 1976, are valid reclamation permits for the purposes of this article and are subject to the provisions of this article for the purpose of renewal. An application for renewal shall be filed at least ninety days prior to the expiration of the reclamation permit. Such applications shall be in accordance with section 34-32-112; except that the applicant need not supply information, materials, and undertakings previously supplied. The application for renewal of a reclamation permit shall show the area mined or disturbed and the area reclaimed since the original reclamation permit or the last renewal.

An operator with an existing reclamation permit granted under the provisions of the "Colorado Open Mining Land Reclamation Act of 1973" may apply for the conversion of his existing reclamation permit to a reclamation permit for the life of the mine under the provision for renewal set forth in this subsection (3) at any time on or after July 1, 1976. The fee for the conversion of such an existing reclamation permit shall not exceed two hundred dollars if the conversion is made during the first year of the reclamation permit.

Thereafter, the provisions of section 34-32-127 (2) shall apply.

Mining operations which were lawfully being conducted prior to July 1, 1976, without a reclamation permit may continue to be so conducted until October 1, 1977, if, between July 1, 1976, and October 1, 1977, the operators of such existing mining operations apply for a reclamation permit as specified in this article. Any such operator, having made application by October 1, 1977, but not having received a reclamation permit by that date, shall be permitted to continue his mining operation until such reclamation permit is either granted or denied. Any such operator who is denied a reclamation permit and continues operations after such denial or who has not applied for a reclamation permit by October 1, 1977, and continues operations after October 1, 1977, shall be considered in violation of this article and subject to the provisions of section 34-32-123. An operator of an existing operation who is in compliance with all requirements of the statutes in effect prior to July 1, 1976, and the rules, regulations, and orders issued thereunder, and any applicable stabilization and reclamation agreements shall not be denied a reclamation permit if he provides performance and financial warranties and undertakes such new reclamation program as may reasonably be required in relation to his existing operation, pursuant to the provisions of this article.

Reclamation permits granted pursuant to applications, including applications for renewal, filed after June 30, 1976, shall be effective for the life of the particular mining operation if the operator complies with the conditions of such reclamation permits and with the provisions of this article and rules promulgated pursuant to this article which are in effect at the time the permit is issued or amended, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (5). Nothing in this article shall be construed to abrogate the duty of the operator to comply with other applicable statutes and rules and regulations.

This paragraph (b) shall apply to new statutory or regulatory requirements only and shall not serve to reopen the entire permit for technical review or for modification of the postmining land use.

The board may, where good cause is shown, determine that certain regulations not in effect at the time a permit is given should be applicable to such existing permits or to any specified class or category of existing permits, if:

The board or office provides individual notice of the subject matter of the proposed rule in such manner as the board may require and the time, date, and place of the rule-making hearing to operators with existing permits who may be affected by such rule;

The board finds during the rule-making hearing that a failure to apply such proposed rule to existing permits or to an affected class or category of existing permits would pose a reasonable potential for danger to persons or property or the environment; and

The board sets a schedule for existing permit-holding operators to comply which is reasonable in light of the gravity of the risk to be avoided, any technical considerations, the cost of compliance, and any other relevant factors.

If the board makes a good faith effort to comply with the requirements of sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b) and complies with the applicable provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the adopted rule shall not be deemed invalid on the ground that notice to the affected parties was inadequate.

No governmental office of the state, other than the board, nor any political subdivision of the state shall have the authority to issue a reclamation permit pursuant to this article, to require reclamation standards different than those established in this article, or to require any performance or financial warranty of any kind for mining operations. The operator shall be responsible for assuring that the mining operation and the postmining land use comply with city, town, county, or city and county land use regulations and any master plan for extraction adopted pursuant to section 34-1-304 unless a prior declaration of intent to change or waive the prohibition is obtained by the applicant from the affected political subdivisions. Any mining operator subject to this article shall also be subject to zoning and land use authority and regulation by political subdivisions as provided by law.

An operator shall obtain a reclamation permit from the board for each mining operation with the exception of those specified in section 34-32-110 (1) and (2).

After the filing of any application for a reclamation permit under this article, the board shall notify each county in which the area proposed to be mined is located and each municipality located within two miles of the area to be mined of the filing of the application.

All mining operations for construction materials, as defined in section 34-32.5-103 (3), shall be subject to the provisions of article 32.5 of this title and not this article. Construction materials mining operations operating under permits issued prior to July 1, 1995, under the provisions of this article, shall continue to operate under such permits and such permits shall be deemed to be permits issued under the provisions of article 32.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 729, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(6) amended, p. 1562, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 81:

(4) and (6) amended, p. 1667, § 3, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(6) amended, p. 1309, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1202, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1432, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 1939, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(5) amended, p. 1177, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(9) added, p. 178, § 2, effective April 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-109 as it existed prior to 1976.